Hawaii statutes.
§560:3-911 Partition for purpose of
distribution. When two or more heirs or devisees are entitled to
distribution of undivided interests in any real or personal property of the
estate, the personal representative or one or more of the heirs or devisees may
petition the court prior to the formal or informal closing of the estate, to
make partition. After notice to the interested heirs or devisees, the court
shall partition the property in the same manner as provided by the law for
civil actions of partition. The court may direct the personal representative
to sell any property which cannot be partitioned without prejudice to the
owners and which cannot conveniently be allotted to any one party. [L 1996, c
288, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next